Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-505.01
Notice; publication.

If a city of the second class or village is required to publish a notice or advertisement in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the city or village, and if there is no legal newspaper in or of general circulation in such city or village, then the city or village shall publish such notice or advertisement in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the county in which such city or village is located. If there is no legal newspaper in or of general circulation in such county, then the city or village shall publish such notice or advertisement by posting a written or printed copy thereof in each of three public places in the city or village for the same period of time such city or village is required to publish the notice or advertisement in a legal newspaper.

Laws 2017, LB133, § 123.